Utah statutes.
26-33a-107.   Limitations on release of reports.

The committee may not release a compilation or report that compares and identifies health care providers or data suppliers unless it:

(1)  allows the data supplier and the health care provider to verify the accuracy of the information submitted to the committee and submit to the committee any corrections of errors with supporting evidence and comments within a reasonable period of time to be established by rule;

(2)  corrects data found to be in error; and

(3)  allows the data supplier a reasonable amount of time prior to publication to review the committee’s interpretation of the data and prepare a response.



Amended by Chapter 201, 1996 General Session

